custom-dicts/ia.dic
Alberta/_G
Aphrodite/_G
Atlanta/_G
Azores/_L
Bangkok/_G
Bielarus/_G
Bulgaria/_G
Caicos/_L
Carola/_G
Cheka/_G
Corcyra/_G
Dar es Salaam/_G
Dresden/_G
Erasmo/_G
Faeroe/_GL
Faust/_G
Gange/_G
Grisonia/_G
Hercules/_G
Inari/_G
Jona/_G
Khorugh/_G
Lacos/_L
Le Corbusier/_G
Mali/_G
Mogol/_G
Normandia/_G
O/_G
Pa/_GL!]|
Patricio/_G
Procyon/_G
Saint Helier/_G
Sophocles/_G
Thebas/_L
Tierra del Fuego/_G
Vietnam/_G
aceraceas/_L
ad hoc/_D
ad valorem/_D
agronomo/_S
alcides/_L
alcun/_Q
aleph/_G
alias/_D
alicun/_Q
alimentari/_A
aliquante/_Q
alique/_P
aliqui/_P
aliquid/_D
aliquid/_P
aliquot/_C!
aliquot/_P!
alquante/_Q
alque/_P
alqui/_P
alterubi/_D
amar/_E
ambe/_Q
androsporangia/_L
anesthesiologo/_SM
aneurinotherapia/_S
anno Domini/_D
anthrosic/_A
antiboom/_C
antidrogas/_C
antiexopero/_C=
antifumo/_C
antigrisu/_C
antimafia/_C
antimilitarista/_Eq
antipolio/_C
antiradiation/_C
antiruito/_C
antismog/_C
antistress/_C
antiusura/_C
appoialibros/_GL
aquelle/_Q
aqueste/_Q
aqui/_D
archenterio/_S
arenacee/_A
artillero/_SM
aurar/_L
autobivalente/_E
automixia/_S
baby/_CU
banchero/_SM
bathyorographic/_A
belles-lettres/_L
ben/_SD
benzina/_S
bifalce/_E
bonettero/_SM
brachyuric/_A
branca/_Sá
byzantinologo/_SM
cachi/_SC
cairota/_E
canides/_L
cannabero/_SM
cappella/_Se
cardiologo/_SM
cascun/_Q
cash/_D
cata/_R
catholic/_A+ko
catun/_Q
cavistigma/_C
ce/_R!
ce/_R!
celle/_Q
ceramologo/_SM
certe/_Q
cerussa/_S
cervical/_E
chrysomelides/_L
clam/_D!
clementina/_S
climatologo/_SM
colitic/_A
componential/_E
conservero/_SM
contrainquesta/_S=
coperitectos/_GL
cornflakes/_L
cotidal/_E
cryptologo/_SM
cuirassero/_SM
cuje/_Q
curvifoliate/_A
da capo/_D
demologo/_SM
depois/_D
dermal/_E
dermatoplastica/_S
dicline/_A
dionysia/_L
dubita/_S
dzongkha/_SC
efficiente/_E
ego/_P!
el/_P!
elbide/_A
electrologo/_SM
ella/_P
en passant/_D
endosteo/_S
erg/_UL[
esclusero/_SM
esse/_Q!
este/_Q!
esule/_A
evangelo/_Saoq
ex aequo/_D
expansionista/_Eq
extra-dry/_C!
ferraliero/_SM
fiftyfifty/_D
fissistipule/_A
flagelliflor/_E
florin/_GL
fluxo/_S
folk/_UC
freelance/_SC
fructero/_SM
frustra/_D!
gazettero/_SM
geodimetro/_S
geothermal/_E
gigantifolie/_A
graphologo/_SM
gris/_GLC
guardainfantes/_GL
gynospora/_S
hahnium/_G
helvetic/_A+f
heterosexual/_Ek
hi-fi/_C!
hieroglypho/_Sq
hippologo/_SM
hoc/_P
homo/_P!
homogene/_Ak
honoris causa/_CD
hottentot/_UC
hyperthyroidia/_So
iconographo/_SM
id/_P
idem/_P
il/_P
illac/_D
ille/_Q
illi/_P!
illiberal/_Ek
immeritate/_A
in extremis/_D
inarrestabile/_E
indifferentiabile/_E
indoor/_C
infra/_D
ingrian/_A
inhabile/_Ek
inoraceas/_L
insulto/_S
interfederal/_E
intro/_D
inutile/_Ek
io/_P
is/_P
isomagnetic/_A
isse/_Q!
iste/_Q
jam/_D
jo/_P!
kaki/_SC
khmer/_C+f
knockdown/_UC
komi/_E
lactone/_Sq
lampadero/_SM
lanceabombas/_GL
lato sensu/_D
le/_Q
lenticellose/_A
li/_P!
li/_R!
linguas de oc/_L
longanime/_Ek
longitan/_D
lor/_Q
luba-lulua/_S
luctuose/_A
macellero/_SM
macho/_SCo
macis/_GL
marcapaginas/_GL
martellina/_S
me/_P
medial/_E
megastachye/_A
mellero/_SM
mi/_P
mi/_Q
microclima/_S
milimat/_L
mini/_SC
moleste/_A
molto/_D
monobloco/_C
monogranular/_E
montaniero/_SM
motacilla/_S
myriostachye/_A
mythographo/_SM
nasolacrimal/_E
necun/_Q
nemathelminthos/_L
nemine/_P!
nemo/_P
nephrologia/_Saq
noi/_P!
non-residential/_E
nondum/_D
nonnulle/_Q!
nonstop/_C
nos/_P
nostre/_Q
nubicole/_A
nulle/_Qk
numerologo/_SM
offline/_CD
olfactologia/_Sq
omne/_R
on-shore/_CD!
on/_P
orange/_SCaeo
organologo/_SM
ornamental/_Ea
orthocephale/_Aq
paleogeologo/_SM
panzer/_GL
parapsychologo/_SMq
parazoari/_A
paternalista/_Eq
patroclinia/_S
pauc/_Qk
periecos/_L
petitionero/_SM
phagocytari/_A
pietista/_Eq
plasticismo/_S
plu/_D
plumifere/_A
plure/_R
poc/_Q
politologo/_SM
polygonaceas/_L
portacartuchas/_GL
portastilos/_GL
postfascista/_Eq
pre/_D!
preolympic/_A
prohibitionista/_Eq
proque/_D
psychobiochimista/_S
putride/_Ak
pz/_GL!)|
qual/_Rk
qualcosa/_P
qualcun/_Q
qualcunque/_R
qualque/_R
quante/_Qkq
que/_R
quecunque/_P
qui/_P
quid/_P!
quin/_D
quincaliero/_SM
quinquennal/_E
quod/_P!
redox/_C
retrocardiac/_A
rifamicina/_S
rumpe-undas/_GL
salvadoren/_A+f
sefardi/_E
semasiologo/_SM
semipectinate/_A
sempre/_D
sen/_GL
silicone/_S
spasmogene/_Aq
spath/_GTq
standard/_UC
stotini/_L
su/_Q
subcaudal/_E
subdeveloppate/_A
subgovernator/_SM
subinde/_D
sui/_P!
sumerologia/_Sq
taphophobe/_Aq
tectibranchiatos/_L
thalassocrate/_Eq
ti/_P!
tisana/_S
topless/_C
tote/_Q
totevia/_D
tragediano/_SM
tu/_Q
turbodiesel/_GL
turbose/_A
ulle/_Q
un/_Qk
unaltere/_P
ureterovesical/_E
usquam/_D
vertebra/_S
video/_SC
vivandero/_SM
voi/_P!
vostre/_Q
weber/_UL[
yo/_P
à outrance/_D
Ωm/_GL!]|
